src/fst/morphology/affixes/pp.lexc
! Nominal inflection and derivation

! possessives
LEXICON ADP_FRONT_POSS
+PxSg1:%>ni  ADP_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxSg2:%>si  ADP_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxSg3:%>nsä ADP_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxPl1:%>mme ADP_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxPl2:%>nne ADP_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxPl3:%>nsä ADP_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;

LEXICON ADP_BACK_POSS
+PxSg1:%>ni  ADP_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxSg2:%>si  ADP_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxSg3:%>nsa ADP_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxPl1:%>mme ADP_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxPl2:%>nne ADP_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxPl3:%>nsa ADP_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;

LEXICON ADP_BACK_POSS_EN
+PxSg3:%>en    ADP_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
+PxPl3:%>en    ADP_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON ADP_FRONT_POSS_EN
+PxSg3:%>en    ADP_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
+PxPl3:%>en    ADP_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON ADP_FRONT_POSS_ÄN
+PxSg3:%>än    ADP_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
+PxPl3:%>än    ADP_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON ADP_BACK_CLIT
+Foc/han:%>han   #        ;
+Foc/han+Foc/kaan:%>hankaan  #        ;
+Foc/han+Qst:%>hanko #        ;
+Foc/han+Foc/pa:%>hanpa #        ;
+Qst:%>ko #        ;
+Qst+Foc/han:%>kohan #        ;
+Qst+Foc/kaan:%>kokaan    #        ;
+Qst+Foc/kin:%>kokin    #        ;
+Qst+Foc/pa:%>kopa   #        ;
+Qst+Foc/s:%>kos    #        ;
+Foc/pa:%>pa #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/han:%>pahan #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/kaan:%>pakaan    #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/kin:%>pakin    #        ;
+Foc/pa+Qst:%>pako   #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/s:%>pas    #        ;
+Foc/kin:%>kin  #        ;
+Foc/kin+Foc/han:%>kinhan  #        ;
+Foc/kin+Foc/kaan:%>kinkaan #        ;
+Foc/kin+Qst:%>kinko    #        ;
+Foc/kin+Foc/pa:%>kinpa    #        ;
+Foc/kaan:%>kaan  #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Foc/han:%>kaanhan  #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Foc/kin:%>kaankin #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Qst:%>kaanko    #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Foc/pa:%>kaanpa    #        ;

LEXICON ADP_FRONT_CLIT
+Foc/han:%>hän   #        ;
+Foc/han+Foc/kaan:%>hänkään  #        ;
+Foc/han+Qst:%>hänkö #        ;
+Foc/han+Foc/pa:%>hänpä #        ;
+Qst:%>kö #        ;
+Qst+Foc/han:%>köhän #        ;
+Qst+Foc/kaan:%>kökään    #        ;
+Qst+Foc/kin:%>kökin    #        ;
+Qst+Foc/pa:%>köpä   #        ;
+Qst+Foc/s:%>kös    #        ;
+Foc/pa:%>pä #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/han:%>pähän #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/kaan:%>päkään    #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/kin:%>päkin    #        ;
+Foc/pa+Qst:%>päkö   #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/s:%>päs    #        ;
+Foc/kin:%>kin  #        ;
+Foc/kin+Foc/han:%>kinhän  #        ;
+Foc/kin+Foc/kaan:%>kinkään #        ;
+Foc/kin+Qst:%>kinkö    #        ;
+Foc/kin+Foc/pa:%>kinpä    #        ;
+Foc/kaan:%>kään  #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Foc/han:%>käänhän  #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Foc/kin:%>käänkin #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Qst:%>käänkö    #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Foc/pa:%>käänpä    #        ;


! shorthands

LEXICON ADP_BACK_CLIT_OPT
0    #   ;
0   ADP_BACK_CLIT    ;

LEXICON ADP_FRONT_CLIT_OPT
0    #   ;
0   ADP_FRONT_CLIT    ;

LEXICON ADP_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT
0    ADP_FRONT_POSS   ;
0    ADP_FRONT_POSS_ÄN  ;
0    ADP_FRONT_CLIT ;
0    #    ;

LEXICON ADP_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT
0    ADP_BACK_POSS   ;
0    ADP_BACK_POSS_EN ;
0    ADP_BACK_CLIT ;
0    #    ;

LEXICON ADP_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT
0    ADP_FRONT_POSS   ;
0    ADP_FRONT_POSS_EN  ;
0    ADP_FRONT_CLIT ;
0    #    ;

LEXICON ADP_BACK_CLIT_KA

+Foc/ka:%>ka	# ;


LEXICON ADP_BACK_CLIT_KA_S

+Foc/ka:%>ka	# ;

+Foc/ka+Foc/han:%>ka%>han	# ;

+Foc/ka+Foc/pa:%>kapa	# ;

+Foc/ka+Foc/pa+Foc/han:%>ka%>pa%>han	# ;

+Foc/ka+Foc/pa+Foc/s:%>ka%>pa%>s	# ;

+Foc/ka+Foc/s:%>ka%>s	# ;

+Foc/s:%>s	# ;


LEXICON ADP_BACK_CLIT_KO

+Qst:%>ko	# ;

+Qst+Foc/han:%>ko%>han	# ;

+Qst+Foc/s:%>ko%>s	# ;



LEXICON ADP_BACK_POSS_AN

+Px3:%>an	ADP_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


!!LEXICON ADP_BACK_POSS_AN_OBL
!!
!!:	ADP_BACK_POSS ;
!!
!!:	ADP_BACK_POSS_AN ;


LEXICON ADP_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT

:	ADP_BACK_POSS ;

:	ADP_BACK_POSS_AN ;

:	ADP_BACK_CLIT ;

:	# ;



!!LEXICON ADP_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL
!!
!!:	ADP_BACK_POSS ;
!!
!!:	ADP_BACK_POSS_EN ;




LEXICON ADP_FRONT_CLIT_KA_S

+Foc/ka:%>kä	# ;

+Foc/ka+Foc/han:%>kä%>hän	# ;

+Foc/ka+Foc/pa:%>kä%>pä	# ;

+Foc/ka+Foc/pa+Foc/han:%>kä%>pä%>hän	# ;

+Foc/ka+Foc/pa+Foc/s:%>kä%>pä%>s	# ;

+Foc/ka+Foc/s:%>kä%>s	# ;

+Foc/s:%>s	# ;



LEXICON ADP_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL

:	ADP_FRONT_POSS ;

:	ADP_FRONT_POSS_EN ;



!!LEXICON ADP_FRONT_POSS_OPT
!!
!!:	ADP_FRONT_POSS ;
!!
!!:	ADP_FRONT_CLIT ;
!!
!!:	# ;



!!LEXICON ADP_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OBL
!!
!!:	ADP_FRONT_POSS ;
!!
!!:	ADP_FRONT_POSS_ÄN ;
!!
